Hawaii statutes.
[§236E-16] Liability for failure to pay tax
before distribution or delivery. (a) Any personal representative who
distributes any property without first paying, securing another's payment of,
or furnishing security for payment of the estate taxes due under this chapter
shall be personally liable for the taxes due to the extent of the value of any
property that may come or may have come into the possession of the personal
representative. Security for payment of the estate taxes due under this
chapter shall be in an amount not less than the value of all property that is
or has come into the possession of the personal representative, as of the time
the security is furnished.

(b) Any person who has the control, custody,
or possession of any property and who delivers any of the property to the
personal representative or legal representative of the decedent outside the
State without first paying, securing another's payment of, or furnishing
security for payment of the estate taxes due under this chapter shall be liable
for the taxes to the extent of the value of the property delivered. Security
for payment of the estate taxes due under this chapter shall be in an amount
not less than the value of all property delivered to the personal
representative or legal representative of the decedent outside the State by the
person.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a person
does not have control, custody, or possession of a decedent's property, if the
person is not responsible for paying the tax due under this section.

For the purposes of this subsection,
"person" may include but is not limited to a stockbroker or stock
transfer agent, bank or other depository of checking and savings account,
safe-deposit company, or life insurance company.

(d) For the purposes of this section, any
person who has the control, custody, or possession of any property and who
delivers any of the property to the personal representative or legal
representative of the decedent may rely upon the release furnished by the
department to the personal representative as evidence of compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, and make any delivery and transfer as the
personal representative may direct without being liable for any estate taxes
due under this chapter. [L 2012, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next